Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.071

Licensee's bond—Action on—Priorities—Cash deposit, payment from.

Any person, firm, or corporation sustaining any damage or injury by reason of the principal's breach of the conditions of the bond required under RCW 19.28.041 may bring an action against the surety named therein, joining in the action the principal named in the bond; the action shall be brought in the superior court of any county in which the principal on the bond resides or transacts business, or in the county in which the work was performed as a result of which the breach is alleged to have occurred; the action shall be maintained and prosecuted as other civil actions. Claims or actions against the surety on the bond shall be paid in full in the following order of priority: (1) Labor, including employee benefits, (2) materials and equipment used upon such work, (3) taxes and contributions due to the state, (4) damages sustained by any person, firm or corporation due to the failure of the principal to make the installation in accordance with the provisions of chapter 19.28 RCW, or any ordinance, building code, or regulation applicable thereto: PROVIDED, That the total liability of the surety on any bond shall not exceed the sum of four thousand dollars and the surety on the bond shall not be liable for monetary penalties; and any action shall be brought within one year from the completion of the work in the performance of which the breach is alleged to have occurred. The surety shall mail a conformed copy of the judgment against the bond to the department within seven days.

In the event that a cash or securities deposit has been made in lieu of the surety bond, and in the event of a judgment being entered against such depositor and deposit, the director shall upon receipt of a certified copy of a final judgment, pay said judgment from such deposit.

[ 2001 c 211 s 5; 1986 c 156 s 8; 1969 ex.s. c 71 s 3; 1965 ex.s. c 117 s 4; 1935 c 169 s 5; RRS s 8307-5. Prior: 1919 c 204 s 4. Formerly RCW 19.28.180.]